Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.230

Involuntary dissolution of towns—Authorized.

If any town fails for two successive years to hold its regular municipal election, or if the officers elected at the regular election of any town fail for two successive years to qualify and the government of the town ceases to function by reason thereof, the state auditor may petition the superior court of the county for an order, dissolving the town. In addition to stating the facts which would justify the entry of such an order, the petition shall set forth a detailed statement of the assets and liabilities of the town insofar as they can be ascertained.

[ 1995 c 301 s 34; 1965 c 7 s 35.07.230. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 76 s 1; RRS s 8931-1.]